Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1654.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2017, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 12, is amended to read: Sec. 12. FOOD HALL LICENSE; MINNEAPOLIS. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 340A.101, subdivision 25, 340A.401, or 340A.410, subdivision 7, or any other law or ordinance to the contrary, the city of Minneapolis may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license for a licensee serving as an anchor tenant for a food hall deleted text begin to be located at 501 30th Avenue Southeastdeleted text end . The license may allow service and consumption anywhere within the licensee establishment, and anywhere within the larger food hall, provided that the larger premises is specified in the on-sale license. Multiple independent food vendors will be able to utilize a common seating area under the control of the liquor license holder to allow the public to purchase and consume food from third parties while also consuming licensed beverages sold by the license holder.new text begin Licenses may only be issued for food halls at the following locations:new text end new text begin (1) 501 30th Avenue Southeast; and new text end new text begin (2) 800 LaSalle Avenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the city of Minneapolis and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021. new text end